Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1261 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any insurer who is authorized to write policies for auto
insurance in the State of Oklahoma shall submit to the Oklahoma
Insurance Department its accident investigation process by July 1,
2027, or upon initial application for licensure thereafter. Failure
to comply with its investigation process shall result in a fine of
up to Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for a first offense, nor
less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for a second offense.
Req. No. 15418 Page 1

Upon a third offense, and each subsequent offense thereafter, the
insurer's privilege to write new business in Oklahoma shall be
suspended for a ninety-day period.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1262 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
In instances where a police report is produced as a result of an
auto accident, the insurer shall pay any claims according to the
police report. Insurers may refute a claim under this section by
submitting a request to the Oklahoma Insurance Department for
arbitration. If the Insurance Commissioner determines that the
insurer has violated this section, the insurer's privilege of
writing new business in Oklahoma shall be suspended for ninety (90)
days.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15418 MJ 12/23/25







Req. No. 15418 Page 2